ko: 크러스트 갈변 단계: 커스텀; 다크; 부드러움; 중간; 기타
ja: パンの焦げ目レベル: カスタム; 濃い; 薄い; 中くらい; その他
en: Crust browning level: Custom; Dark; Light; Medium; Other
fr: Niveau de brunissement de la croûte: Personnalisé; Foncé; Léger; Moyen; Autre
vi: Mức độ nướng vàng lớp vỏ: Tùy chỉnh; Sẫm màu; Sáng màu; Vừa; Khác
pl: Stopień zrumienienia skórki: Niestandardowe; Ciemny; Jasny; Średnie; Pozostałe
es: Nivel de dorado de la corteza: Al gusto; Oscuro; Ligero; Medio; Otros
da: Skorpes bruningsgrad: Tilpasset; Mørk; Lys; Medium; Andet
nb: Bruningsnivå for skorpe: Tilpasset; Mørk; Lett; Middels; Annet
th: ระดับความเหลืองกรอบของเปลือกขนมปัง: กำหนดเอง; แบบเข้ม; แบบมีไฟ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
el: Επίπεδο ροδίσματος κόρας: Προσαρμοσμένο; Σκούρο; Ανοιχτόχρωμο; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
hu: A kéreg barnulási szintje: Egyéni; Sötét; Világos; Közepes; Egyéb
it: Livello di doratura della crosta: Personalizzato; Scuro; Leggero; Medio; Altro
nl: Bruiningsniveau van de korst: Aangepast; Donker; Licht; Medium; Overig
sv: Skorpfärg: Anpassad; Mörk; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
fi: Kuoren ruskistusaste: Mukautettu; Tumma; Kevyt; Keskitaso; Muu
ru: Уровень подрумянивания корочки: Индивидуальная настройка; Темная; Светлая; Средняя; Другая
tr: Kabuk kızarma seviyesi: Özel; Koyu; Açık; Orta; Diğer
sl-SI: Stopnja porjavitve skorje: Po meri; Temna; Lahke; Srednja; Druga
bg-BG: Степен на запичане на коричката: Персонализирано; Тъмно; Светло; Средно; Друго
zh-TW: 麵包烤色程度: 客製化; 深色; 淺色; 適中; 其他
pt-BR: Nível de douramento da crosta: Personalizada; Escuro; Leve; Médio; Outro
lt-LT: Plutos apskrudinimo lygis: Pasirinktinis; Tamsus; Šviesus; Vidutinis; Kita
sk-SK: Stupeň zhnednutia kôrky: Prispôsobený; Tmavý; Svetlý; Stredný; Iné
cs: Stupeň zbarvení kůrky: Vlastní; Velmi propečené (dotmava); Mírně propečené; Středně propečené (dozlatova); Jiné
zh-CN: 外皮褐变程度: 自定义; 深色; 浅色; 中等; 其他
hr-HR: Stupanj zapečenosti kore: Prilagođeno; Tamno; Lagano; Srednje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Nivelul de rumenire a crustei: Personalizat; Închis; Ușor; Mediu; Altele
de: Bräunungsgrad der Kruste: Individuell; Dunkel; Leicht; Medium; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Nível de tostagem da crosta: À medida; Escuro; Leve; Médio; Outro